District of Columbia statutes.
26-305

Application and license fees.

At the time of filing an application under this chapter, each applicant shall pay to the Superintendent [Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking] a non-refundable license fee of $300, except that an applicant for a license to maintain one or more limited stations shall pay the non-refundable limited station license application fee as provided in § 26-314.

History

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 6, 45 DCR 1782

Section References

This section is referenced in § 26-308.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-1105.